Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 3

Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities

Effective Dates.

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 5: Mar. 9, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current extremely harsh remedy under the rule against perpetuities that renders a grantor's entire grant void if the grant violates the rule is outdated and should be replaced; that the common law rule fosters litigation at great cost to the citizens of this state because of its many complexities, with often devastating consequences to estates; and that the revision by this act of the common law remedy to permit the likely occurrence that a grant will vest or to permit a court to reform a grant that does not vest in the manner that most likely approximate the transferor's manifested plan is immediately necessary for the good of the citizens of this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-3-101. Statutory rule against perpetuities.

(a)

A nonvested property interest is invalid unless:

(1)

when the interest is created, it is certain to vest or terminate no later than 21 years after the death of an individual then alive; or

(2)

the interest either vests or terminates within 90 years after its creation.

(b)

A general power of appointment not presently exercisable because of a condition precedent is invalid unless:

(1)

when the power is created, the condition precedent is certain to be satisfied or becomes impossible to satisfy no later than 21 years after the death of an individual then alive; or

(2)

the condition precedent either is satisfied or becomes impossible to satisfy within 90 years after its creation.

(c)

A nongeneral power of appointment or a general testamentary power of appointment is invalid unless:

(1)

when the power is created, it is certain to be irrevocably exercised or otherwise to terminate no later than 21 years after the death of an individual then alive; or

(2)

the power is irrevocably exercised or otherwise terminates within 90 years after its creation.

(d)

In determining whether a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment is valid under subdivision (a)(1), (b)(1), or (c)(1) of this section, the possibility that a child will be born to an individual after the individual's death is disregarded.

(e)

If, in measuring a period from the creation of a trust or other property arrangement, language in a governing instrument (i) seeks to disallow the vesting or termination of any interest or trust beyond, (ii) seeks to postpone the vesting or termination of any interest or trust until, or (iii) seeks to operate in effect in any similar fashion upon, the later of (A) the expiration of a period of time not exceeding 21 years after the death of the survivor of specified lives in being at the creation of the trust or other property arrangement or (B) the expiration of a period of time that exceeds or might exceed 21 years after the death of the survivor of lives in being at the creation of the trust or other property arrangement, that language is inoperative to the extent it produces a period of time that exceeds 21 years after the death of the survivor of the specified lives.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 1.

18-3-102. When nonvested property interest or power of appointment created.

(a)

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section and in §18-3-105(a), the time of creation of a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment is determined under general principles of property law.

(b)

For purposes of this chapter, if there is a person who alone can exercise a power created by a governing instrument to become the unqualified beneficial owner of (i) a nonvested property interest or (ii) a property interest subject to a power of appointment described in §18-3-101(b) or §18-3-101(c), the nonvested property interest or power of appointment is created when the power to become the unqualified beneficial owner terminates.

(c)

For purposes of this chapter, a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising from a transfer of property to a previously funded trust or other existing property arrangement is created when the nonvested property interest or power of appointment in the original contribution was created.

(d)

For purposes of this chapter, if a nongeneral power of appointment or a general testamentary power of appointment is used to create another nongeneral power of appointment or general testamentary power of appointment, the nonvested property interest or power of appointment created through the exercise of the other nongeneral power of appointment or general testamentary power of appointment is considered to have been created at the same time the first nongeneral power of appointment or general testamentary power of appointment was created.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 1; 2017, No. 945, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 945, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Dynasty Trust Act’.”

Acts 2017, No. 945, § 2, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(1)

Join the majority of states that allow the creation of
perpetual trusts also commonly known as dynasty trusts;

“(2)

Benefit successive generations of beneficiaries by protecting trust assets from federal taxes and the creditors of a beneficiary;

“(3)

Amend the current rule against perpetuities so that perpetual trusts may be created in the State of Arkansas, increasing trust business within the state, instead of having a trust grantor create a trust
in a foreign state for the sole purpose of ensuring the life of the trust
beyond the short period of time granted by Arkansas's rule against perpetuities; and

“(4)

Amend the current rule against perpetuities to allow the
transfer of trust assets held in trust back to the State of Arkansas without
creating a taxable event.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (d).

18-3-103. Reformation.

Upon the petition of an interested person, a court shall reform a disposition in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor's manifested plan of distribution and is within the 90 years allowed by §18-3-101(a)(2), §18-3-101(b)(2), or §18-3-101(c)(2) if:

(1)

a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment becomes invalid under §18-3-101;

(2)

a class gift is not but might become invalid under §18-3-101 and the time has arrived when the share of any class member is to take effect in possession or enjoyment; or

(3)

a nonvested property interest that is not validated by §18-3-101(a)(1) can vest but not within 90 years after its creation.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 1.

18-3-104. Exclusions from statutory rule against perpetuities.

Section 18-3-101 does not apply to:

(1)

a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising out of a nondonative transfer, except a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising out of (i) a premarital or postmarital agreement, (ii) a separation or divorce settlement, (iii) a spouse's election, (iv) a similar arrangement arising out of a prospective, existing, or previous marital relationship between the parties, (v) a contract to make or not to revoke a will or trust, (vi) a contract to exercise or not to exercise a power of appointment, (vii) a transfer in satisfaction of a duty of support, or (viii) a reciprocal transfer;

(2)

a fiduciary's power relating to the administration or management of assets, including the power of a fiduciary to sell, lease, or mortgage property, and the power of a fiduciary to determine principal and income;

(3)

a power to appoint a fiduciary;

(4)

a discretionary power of a trustee to distribute principal before termination of a trust to a beneficiary having an indefeasibly vested interest in the income and principal;

(5)

a nonvested property interest held by a charity, government, or governmental agency or subdivision, if the nonvested property interest is preceded by an interest held by another charity, government, or governmental agency or subdivision;

(6)

a nonvested property interest in or a power of appointment with respect to a trust or other property arrangement forming part of a pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, health, disability, death benefit, income deferral, or other current or deferred benefit plan for one or more employees, independent contractors, or their beneficiaries or spouses, to which contributions are made for the purpose of distributing to or for the benefit of the participants or their beneficiaries or spouses the property, income, or principal in the trust or other property arrangement, except a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment that is created by an election of a participant or a beneficiary or spouse;

(7)

a property interest, power of appointment, or arrangement that was not subject to the common-law rule against perpetuities or is excluded by another statute of this State; or

(8)(A)

a nonvested property interest or power of appointment provided in a trust created or administered in this state so long as the trust:

(i)

has one (1) or more trustees who are able to convey an absolute fee in possession of land, or full ownership of personal property;

(ii)

has one (1) or more trustees with express or implied power to sell the trust assets; or

(iii)

vests in one (1) or more persons in being the unlimited power to terminate the trust.

(B)

if the power of alienation is suspended during the life of the trust, the rule against perpetuities under §18-3-101 will begin to run from the date of suspension.

(C)

the exception created in this subdivision (8) applies to a trust created in Arkansas on or after August 1, 2017 and to any other trust whose principal place of administration is transferred to Arkansas on or after August 1, 2017, regardless of when the trust was created.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 1; 2017, No. 945, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 945, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Dynasty Trust Act’.”

Acts 2017, No. 945, § 2, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(1)

Join the majority of states that allow the creation of
perpetual trusts also commonly known as dynasty trusts;

“(2)

Benefit successive generations of beneficiaries by protecting trust assets from federal taxes and the creditors of a beneficiary;

“(3)

Amend the current rule against perpetuities so that perpetual trusts may be created in the State of Arkansas, increasing trust business within the state, instead of having a trust grantor create a trust
in a foreign state for the sole purpose of ensuring the life of the trust
beyond the short period of time granted by Arkansas's rule against perpetuities; and

“(4)

Amend the current rule against perpetuities to allow the
transfer of trust assets held in trust back to the State of Arkansas without
creating a taxable event.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (8).

18-3-105. Prospective application.

(a)

Except as extended by subsection (b) of this section, this chapter applies to a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment that is created on or after March 9, 2007. For purposes of this section, a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment created by the exercise of a power of appointment is created when the power is irrevocably exercised or when a revocable exercise becomes irrevocable.

(b)

If a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment was created before March 9, 2007, and is determined in a judicial proceeding, commenced on or after March 9, 2007, to violate this State's rule against perpetuities as that rule existed before March 9, 2007, a court upon the petition of an interested person may reform the disposition in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor's manifested plan of distribution and is within the limits of the rule against perpetuities applicable when the nonvested property interest or power of appointment was created.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 1.

18-3-106. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 1.

18-3-107. Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 1.

18-3-108. [Reserved.]

This chapter supersedes the rule of the common law known as the rule against perpetuities.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 1.

18-3-109. Supercession of common law.